Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1856
Construction of new facilities; prior approval not required.

A jurisdictional utility shall not be required to obtain prior approval from the commission to begin the construction of any new plant, equipment, property, or facility that the utility determines to be necessary to provide adequate and reliable service to ratepayers.

Laws 2003, LB 790, § 56.